Mississippi statutes. Title 49. Conservation and Ecology
Migratory Waterfowl Stamps

§ 49-7-161.
Definitions.

For purposes of Sections 49-7-161 through 49-7-173, unless the context otherwise requires, the following terms shall have the meaning described herein:

“Migratory waterfowl” means any wild goose, brant or wild duck.

“Commission” means the Mississippi Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks.

“Stamp” means the state migratory waterfowl stamp or the electronic equivalent furnished by the commission.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 434, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 463, § 6; Laws, 2003, ch. 323, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2003.

§ 49-7-163.
Unlawful to hunt or take migratory waterfowl without stamp or electronic equivalent; validation of stamp or proof of purchase of electronic equivalent; issuance or sale of stamp or electronic equivalent.

It is unlawful for any person sixteen (16) years of age or older to hunt or take any migratory waterfowl within this state without first procuring a state migratory waterfowl stamp or its electronic equivalent and having the stamp or proof of purchase of the electronic equivalent in his possession while hunting or taking any migratory waterfowl. Any penalty for not having the stamp in possession while engaged in hunting or taking migratory waterfowl shall be waived if the person can verify purchase of a stamp prior to the date of the violation. Each stamp shall be validated by the signature of the licensee written across the face of the stamp or the proof of purchase of the electronic equivalent. The commission shall determine the form of the stamp and the electronic equivalent and shall furnish the stamps to bonded agents for issuance or sale in the same manner as other types of licenses or cause the electronic equivalent to accrue to the purchaser’s benefit when purchasing a license from an automated point of sale vendor.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 434, § 2; Laws, 1993, ch. 463, § 7; Laws, 1996, ch. 371, § 1; Laws, 2003, ch. 323, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2003.

§ 49-7-165.
Fee for stamp.

The fee for each stamp issued under Sections 49-7-161 through 49-7-173 shall be Ten Dollars ($10.00).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 434, § 3; Laws, 1993, ch. 463, § 8; Laws, 2001, ch. 436, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 49-7-167.
Disposition of revenues.

All revenue shall be used for projects approved by the commission for the purpose of protecting and propagating migratory waterfowl and for the development, restoration, maintenance or preservation of wetlands. Provided, however, that none of such funds shall be expended for administrative salaries.

The commission may enter into contracts with nonprofit organizations for the use of part of such funds outside the United States, if the commission finds that such contracts are necessary for carrying out the purposes of Sections 49-7-161 through 49-7-173.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 434, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1976.

§ 49-7-169.
Commission may enter into reciprocal agreements with other states.

The commission may enter into reciprocal agreements with other states having a state migratory waterfowl stamp.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 434, § 5; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 74, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 49-7-171.
Ascertainment of acceptability of projects undertaken outside of state.

Before approving and allocating funds for a proposed project to be undertaken outside this state or outside the United States, the commission shall obtain evidence that the project is acceptable to the government agency having jurisdiction over the lands and waters affected by the project.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 434, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1976.

§ 49-7-173.
Penalties.

Any person violating any of the provisions of Sections 49-7-161 through 49-7-173 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be fined not less than Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) nor more than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 434, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1976.